Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
PART 2 Licenses

3-4-110.
Adoption of local rules and regulations governing issuance of licenses and conduct of licensees.

The governing authority of every county and municipality authorized to issue licenses as provided in this article shall have the power and authority to adopt all reasonable rules and regulations governing the qualifications and criteria for the issuance of any licenses for the sale of distilled spirits by the drink and shall further have the power to promulgate reasonable rules and regulations governing the conduct of any licensee provided for in this article, including, but not limited to, the regulation of hours of business, types of employees, and other matters which may fall within the police powers of such municipalities or counties. These powers shall be exercised only after the authority to do so has been granted pursuant to the procedures prescribed in Code Section 3-4-91 or 3-4-92.

History.

Ga. L. 1964, p. 771, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 1140, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1972, p. 207, § 13; Ga. L. 1973, p. 610, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-2904, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

Law reviews.

For comment on Moose Lodge v. Irvis, 407 U.S. 163,

92 S. Ct. 1965

,

32 L. Ed. 2

d 627 (1972), holding the granting of a liquor license to a discriminatory private club insufficient to constitute state action prohibited by the fourteenth amendment, see 22 J. of Pub. L. 281 (1973).

3-4-111.
Sale by wholesalers to licensees; purchase by licensees from wholesalers; declaration of contraband.

Those persons who are duly licensed as wholesalers of distilled spirits under this title may sell distilled spirits at wholesale prices to any person or persons licensed as provided in this article. Persons licensed under this article may purchase distilled spirits from a licensed wholesaler at wholesale prices.

Any distilled spirits possessed, sold, or offered for sale by a retail dealer or retail consumption dealer which are purchased or otherwise acquired from any person other than a wholesale dealer authorized to do business under this chapter are declared to be contraband and shall be seized and disposed of by the commissioner in the manner provided in this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1964, p. 771, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 1140, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1972, p. 207, § 13; Ga. L. 1973, p. 610, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-2905, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 827, § 3/HB 1066.

3-4-111.1.
Occupational license tax upon retail consumption dealers; annual payment; application.

An annual occupational license tax in the amount of $100.00 is imposed upon each retail consumption dealer in this state.

The annual occupational license tax shall be paid for each place of business operated. An application for a retail consumption dealer’s license required pursuant to this title along with the payment of the tax required by subsection (a) of this Code section shall be submitted to the department immediately upon assuming control of the place of business and annually thereafter for so long as the business is operated.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-2921, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 39; Ga. L. 2012, p. 827, § 4/HB 1066.